Hawaii statutes.
§323F-6 Records. (a) The corporation
and each regional system board shall be subject to the requirements of chapter
92F, except that the following categories of government records shall not be
required to be disclosed:

(1) Applications for credentials or staff privileges
at any of the corporation's medical facilities, records from peer review
proceedings, and medical records; and

(2) Marketing strategies, strategic plans,
evaluations, assessments, negotiations, or rates and charges, the disclosure of
which would raise the cost of procurement or give a manifestly unfair advantage
to any competitor or to any person or entity seeking to do business or
proposing to enter into an agreement with a regional system board, the
corporation, or any of its facilities.

Any person denied access to any such government
records shall have available the remedies specified in sections 92F-15 and
92F-15.5. Government records protected from disclosure by this section shall
be subject to the interagency disclosure provisions of section 92F-19. Section
624-25.5 shall apply to this part notwithstanding anything to the contrary
contained in this section.

(b) The corporation shall have the authority
to set rates for copies of records protected by this section from the disclosure
requirements of chapter 92F. For medical records subpoenaed from any of the
corporation's regional system facilities, copies shall be paid for by the
requester in an amount based on the facility's actual cost of preparation;
provided that the amount shall be no less than $1 per page and no more than $2
per page. [L 1996, c 262, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 290, §22; am L 2016, c 73, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next